src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection
The inflection first gives N, Nom and gender tags, then point to oblique cases.

## The noun continuation lexica

### Masculines

**LEXICON RAKLO** adds -o for Sg Nom and redirects to MSCOBL

**LEXICON LAU** 

**LEXICON BEREH** 

**LEXICON VUUDAR** 

**LEXICON GRAI** 

**LEXICON DZII** 

**LEXICON IBA** 

**LEXICON BEN** 

**LEXICON OS** 

**LEXICON NIS** 

**LEXICON RIS** 

**LEXICON TIS** 

**LEXICON SSIS** 

**LEXICON IS_PL** 

**LEXICON ES** 

**LEXICON US** 

**LEXICON YS** 

### Feminines

**LEXICON BAAR** pheen, tunnuksettomat fem

**LEXICON KAALI** 

**LEXICON ANGRUSTI** 

**LEXICON KHURMIN** 

**LEXICON BORNIK** 

**LEXICON DAI** 

**LEXICON TSIMB** 

**LEXICON SKOOLA** 

**LEXICON RAADZA** 

## Morphology

### Masculine morphology

**LEXICON MSCOBL** pointing to sg and pl lexica

**LEXICON MSCOBL_SG** 

**LEXICON MSCOBL_SG_ins_s** 

**LEXICON MSCOBL_PL** 

**LEXICON MSCOBL_PL_OBL** 

**LEXICON MSCOBL_PL_o** 

### Feminine morphology

**LEXICON FEMOBL** pointing to sg and pl lexica

**LEXICON FEMOBL_SG** 

**LEXICON FEMOBL_PL** 

**LEXICON FEMOBL_a** pointing to sg and pl lexica

**LEXICON FEMOBL_SG_a** 

**LEXICON FEMOBL_PL_a** 

**LEXICON FEMOBL_PL_OBL** 

**LEXICON FEMOBL_PL_o** 

### The oblique cases *-ke, -ta, -ha*

**LEXICON OBLCASES_SG** 

**LEXICON OBLCASES_SG_ins_s** 

**LEXICON OBLCASES_PL** 

**LEXICON GENCASES** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-rmf/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
